Oklahoma, session 2025, SB422.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-502.5 of Title 63, unless

there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. It shall be unlawful for any federal or state agency, any

political subdivision, or any business under contract with a federal

or state agency or political subdivision to require any resident of

this state to submit to or receive a COVID-19 vaccination or any

variant thereof. Additionally, no federal or state agency,

political subdivision, or business under contract with a federal or

state agency or political subdivision shall discriminate against any

resident of this state due to vaccination status.

B. As used in this section, “political subdivision” means:

Req. No. 131 Page 1

1. A municipality or county;

2. A school district board of education;

3. The board of regents or board of trustees of a state

educational institution which is a member of The Oklahoma State

System of Higher Education; or

4. Any other governmental or public entity located within this

state.

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-131 DC 1/14/2025 3:51:16 PM























Req. No. 131 Page 2